Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,229
Legislative intent.

The Legislature declares that the purpose of allowing taxable income to be reduced by contributions to and earnings from a first-time home buyer savings account is to encourage first-time home ownership through incentivizing saving for a downpayment and closing costs because of the significant financial and civic benefits home ownership provides for this state.

Laws 2026, LB803, § 2.
July 18, 2026